Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 3
Nonjudicial Resolution

§ 15-8-301. Purpose.

The purpose of this part 3[, chapter 8, title 15, Idaho Code,] is to provide a binding nonjudicial procedure to resolve matters through written agreements among the parties interested in the estate or trust. The procedure is supplemental to, and may not derogate from, any other proceeding or provision authorized by statute or the common law.

§ 15-8-302. Binding agreement.

Sections 15-8-301 through 15-8-305, Idaho Code, shall be applicable to the resolution of any matter, as defined in section 15-8-103, Idaho Code, other than matters subject to chapter 5, title 15, Idaho Code, or a trust for a minor or other incapacitated person created at its inception by the judgment or decree of a court unless the judgment or decree provides that sections 15-8-301 through 15-8-305, Idaho Code, shall be applicable. If all parties agree to a resolution of any such matter, then the agreement shall be evidenced by a written agreement signed by all parties. Subject to the provisions of section 15-8-304, Idaho Code, the written agreement shall be binding and conclusive on all persons interested in the estate or trust. The agreement shall identify the subject matter of the dispute and the parties. If the agreement or a memorandum of the agreement is to be filed with the court under section 15-8-303, Idaho Code, the agreement may, but need not, include provisions specifically addressing jurisdiction, governing law, the waiver of notice of the filing and the discharge of any special representative who has acted with respect to the agreement. If a party who virtually represents another person under section 15-8-205, Idaho Code, signs the agreement, then the party’s signature constitutes the signature of all persons whom the party virtually represents, and all the virtually represented persons shall be bound by the agreement.

§ 15-8-303. Entry of agreement with court — Effect.

Any party, or a party’s legal representative, may file the written agreement or a memorandum summarizing the written agreement with the court having jurisdiction over the estate or trust. However, if a special representative is a party to the written agreement, the agreement or a memorandum of its terms may not be filed within thirty (30) days of the agreement’s execution by all parties unless the written consent of the special representative is filed along with, or included within, the provision of such agreement or memorandum. The agreement or a memorandum of its terms may be filed after a special representative has commenced a proceeding under section 15-8-304, Idaho Code, only after the court has determined that the special representative has adequately represented and protected the parties represented. Failure to complete any action authorized or required under this subsection does not cause the written agreement to be ineffective and the agreement is nonetheless binding and conclusive on all persons interested in the estate or trust.

On filing the agreement or memorandum, the agreement will be deemed approved by the court and is equivalent to a final court order binding on all persons interested in the estate or trust.

§ 15-8-304. Judicial approval of agreement.

Within thirty (30) days of execution of the agreement by all parties, the special representative may notice a hearing for presentation of the written agreement to a court of competent jurisdiction. The special representative shall provide notice of the time and date of the hearing to each party to the agreement whose address is known, unless such notice has been waived. Proof of mailing or delivery of the notice must be filed with the court. At such hearing, the court shall review the agreement on behalf of the parties represented by the special representative. The court shall determine whether or not the interests of the represented parties have been adequately represented and protected, and an order declaring the court’s determination shall be entered. If the court determines that such interests have not been adequately represented and protected, the agreement shall be declared of no effect.

§ 15-8-305. Special representative.

The personal representative or trustee may petition the court having jurisdiction over the matter for the appointment of a special representative to represent a person who is interested in the estate or trust and:
(1)(a) The personal representative or trustee may petition the court having jurisdiction over the matter for the appointment of a special representative to represent a person who is interested in the estate or trust and:

Who is a minor;

Who is incompetent or disabled;

Who is yet unborn or unascertained; or

Whose identity or address is unknown.

In appointing the special representative, the court shall give due consideration and deference to any nomination(s) made in the petition, the special skills required in the representation, and the need for a representative who will act independently and prudently. The nomination of a person as special representative by the personal representative or trustee and the person’s willingness to serve as special representative are not grounds by themselves for finding a lack of independence; provided however, the court may consider any interests that the nominating fiduciary may have in the estate or trust in making the determination.

The special representative may enter into a binding agreement on behalf of the person or beneficiary. The special representative may be appointed for more than one (1) person or class of persons if the interests of such persons or class are not in conflict. The petition shall be verified. The petition and order appointing the special representative may be in the following forms:

Petitioner. Petitioner ............... is the qualified and presently acting (personal representative) (trustee) of the above (estate) (trust) having been named (personal representative) (trustee) under (describe will and reference probate order or describe trust instrument.)

Issue Concerning (Estate) (Trust) Administration. A question concerning administration of the (estate) (trust) has arisen as to (describe issue, for example, “Related to interpretation, construction, administration, distribution.”) The issues are appropriate for determination under section 15-8-305, Idaho Code.

Beneficiaries. The beneficiaries of the (estate) (trust) include persons who are unborn, unknown, or unascertained persons, or who are under eighteen (18) years of age: (list, with status of each.)

Special Representative. The nominated special representative ........... is a lawyer licensed to practice before the courts of this state or an individual with special skills or training in the administration of estates or trusts. The nominated special representative does not have an interest in the affected estate or trust and is not related to any person interested in the estate or trust. The nominated special representative is willing to serve. The petitioner has no reason to believe that the nominated special representative will not act in an independent and prudent manner and in the best interests of the represented parties. (It is recommended that the petitioner also include information specifying the particular skills of the nominated special representative that relate to the matter in issue.)
5. Resolution. Petitioner desires to achieve a resolution of the questions that have arisen concerning the (estate) (trust). Petitioner believes that proceeding in accordance with the procedures permitted under sections 15-8-301 through 15-8-305, Idaho Code, would be in the best interests of the (estate) (trust) and the beneficiaries.

Upon appointment by the court, the special representative shall file a sworn certificate made upon penalty of perjury that he or she:

Is not interested in the estate or trust;

Is not related to any person interested in the estate or trust;

Is willing to serve; and

Will act independently, prudently, and in the best interests of the represented parties.

The special representative must be a lawyer licensed to practice before the courts of this state, or an individual with special skills or training in the administration of estates or trusts. The special representative may not have an interest in the affected estate or trust, and may not be related to a person interested in the estate or trust. The special representative is entitled to reasonable compensation for services, which must be paid from the principal of the estate or trust whose beneficiaries are represented.

The special representative shall be discharged from any responsibility and shall have no further duties with respect to the estate or trust or with respect to any person interested in the estate or trust, on the earlier of:

The expiration of six (6) months from the date the special representative was appointed, unless the order appointing the special representative provides otherwise; or

The execution of the written agreement by all parties or their virtual representatives.

Any action against a special representative must be brought before the earlier of:

One (1) year from the discharge of the special representative; or

The entry of an order by a court of competent jurisdiction under section 15-8-304, Idaho Code, approving the written agreement executed by all interested parties in accordance with the provisions of section 15-8-302, Idaho Code.

The petition may be heard by the court without notice.

CAPTION OF CASE PETITION FOR APPOINTMENT OF

SPECIAL REPRESENTATIVE UNDER

SECTION 15-8-305, IDAHO CODE

The undersigned petitioner petitions the court for the appointment of a special representative in accordance with section 15-8-305, Idaho Code, and represents to the court as follows:

6. Request of Court. Petitioner requests that (..............., an attorney licensed to practice in the state of Idaho,) (OR) (................., an individual with special skills or training in the administration of estates or trusts,) be appointed special representative for those beneficiaries who are not yet adults, as well as for the unborn, unknown, and/or unascertained beneficiaries, as provided under section 15-8-305, Idaho Code.

DATED this ....... date of ..............., .............

...............................

(Petitioner or Petitioner’s Legal Representative)

VERIFICATION

I certify under penalty of perjury under the laws of the state of Idaho that the foregoing is true and correct.

DATED .............., ..........., at ......................, Idaho.

...............................

(Petitioner or other person having knowledge)

CAPTION OF CASE ORDER FOR APPOINTMENT OF

SPECIAL REPRESENTATIVE UNDER

SECTION 15-8-305, IDAHO CODE

THIS MATTER having come on for hearing before this Court on Petition for Appointment of Special Representative filed herein, and it appearing that it would be in the best interests of the (estate) (trust) described in the Petition to appoint a special representative to address the issues that have arisen concerning the (estate) (trust) and the Court finding that the facts stated in the Petition are true, now, therefore,

IT IS ORDERED that ....................... is appointed under section 15-8-305, Idaho Code, as special representative for the (estate) (trust) beneficiaries who are not yet adult age, and for unborn, unknown, or unascertained beneficiaries to represent their respective interests in the (estate) (trust) as provided in section 15-8-305, Idaho Code. The special representative shall be discharged of responsibility with respect to the (estate) (trust) at such time as a written agreement is executed resolving the present issues, all as provided in that statute, or if an agreement is not reached within six (6) months from entry of this Order, the special representative appointed under this Order shall be discharged of responsibility, subject to subsequent reappointment under section 15-8-305, Idaho Code.

DONE IN OPEN COURT this ........ day of ..................., .........

...............................

JUDGE